California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) The department shall collect an application fee for enrollment, including continued enrollment or enrollment at a new location or a change in location. The application fee shall not be collected from individual physicians or nonphysician practitioners, from providers that are enrolled in Medicare or another state’s Medicaid program or Children’s Health Insurance Program, from providers that submit proof that they have paid the applicable fee to a Medicare contractor or to another state’s Medicaid program, or pursuant to an exemption or waiver pursuant to federal law. The application fee collected shall be in the amount calculated by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in effect for the calendar year during which the application
 for enrollment is received by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 271, Sec. 3.   (SB 299)   Effective September 4, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.26.

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2004, an applicant that currently is not enrolled in the Medi-Cal program, or a provider applying for continued enrollment, upon written notification from the department that enrollment for continued participation of all providers in a specific provider of service category or subgroup of that category to which the provider belongs will occur, or, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (e), a provider not currently enrolled at a location where the provider intends to provide services, goods, supplies, or merchandise to a Medi-Cal beneficiary, shall submit a complete application package for enrollment, continuing enrollment, or enrollment at a new location or a change in location.

(2) Clinics licensed by the
 department pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and certified by the department to participate in the Medi-Cal program shall not be subject to this section.

(3) Health facilities licensed by the department pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and certified by the department to participate in the Medi-Cal program shall not be subject to this section.

(4) Adult day health care providers licensed pursuant to Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and certified by the department to participate in the Medi-Cal program shall not be subject to this section.

(5) Home health agencies licensed pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1725) of Division 2 of
 the Health and Safety Code and certified by the department to participate in the Medi-Cal program shall not be subject to this section.

(6) Hospices licensed pursuant to Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 1745) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and certified by the department to participate in the Medi-Cal program shall not be subject to this section.

(b) A physician and surgeon licensed by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, or a dentist licensed by the Dental Board of California, practicing as an individual physician practice or as an individual dentist practice, as defined in Section 14043.1, who is enrolled and in good standing in the Medi-Cal program, and who is changing locations of that individual physician practice or individual dentist practice within the same county, shall be eligible to continue enrollment at the
 new location by filing a change of location form to be developed by the department. The form shall comply with all minimum federal requirements related to Medicaid provider enrollment. Filing this form shall be in lieu of submitting a complete application package pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), within 30 days after receiving an application package submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall provide written notice that the application package has been received and, if applicable, that there is a moratorium on the enrollment of providers in the specific provider of service category or subgroup of the category to which the applicant or provider belongs. This moratorium shall bar further processing of the application package.

(2) Within 15 days after receiving an application package from a physician, or a
 group of physicians, licensed by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, or a change of location form pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall provide written notice that the application package or the change of location form has been received.

(d) (1) If the application package submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) is from an applicant or provider who meets the criteria listed in paragraph (2), the applicant or provider shall be considered a preferred provider and shall be granted preferred provisional provider status pursuant to this section and for a period of no longer than 18 months, effective from the date on the notice from the department. The ability to request consideration as a preferred provider and the criteria necessary for the consideration shall be publicized to all applicants and providers. An applicant or provider who desires consideration as a preferred
 provider pursuant to this subdivision shall request consideration from the department by making a notation to that effect on the application package, by cover letter, or by other means identified by the department in a provider bulletin. Request for consideration as a preferred provider shall be made with each application package submitted in order for the department to grant the consideration. An applicant or provider who requests consideration as a preferred provider shall be notified within 60 days whether the applicant or provider meets or does not meet the criteria listed in paragraph (2). If an applicant or provider is notified that the applicant or provider does not meet the criteria for a preferred provider, the application package submitted shall be processed in accordance with the remainder of this section.

(2) To be considered a preferred provider, the applicant or provider shall meet all of the following criteria:

(A) Hold a current license as a physician and surgeon issued by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, which license shall not have been revoked, whether stayed or not, suspended, placed on probation, or subject to other limitation.

(B) Be a current faculty member of a teaching hospital or a children’s hospital, as defined in Section 10727, accredited by the Joint Commission or the American Osteopathic Association, or be credentialed by a health care service plan that is licensed under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code) or county organized health system, or be a current member in good standing of a group that is credentialed by a health care service plan that is licensed under the Knox-Keene Act.

(C) Have full, current, unrevoked, and unsuspended privileges at a Joint Commission or American Osteopathic Association accredited general acute care hospital.

(D) Not have any adverse entries in the federal Healthcare Integrity and Protection Data Bank.

(3) The department may recognize other providers as qualifying as preferred providers if criteria similar to those set forth in paragraph (2) are identified for the other providers. The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders to identify similar criteria for other providers so that they may be considered as preferred providers.

(e) (1) If a Medi-Cal applicant meets the criteria listed in paragraph (2), the applicant shall be enrolled in the Medi-Cal
 program after submission and review of a short form application to be developed by the department. The form shall comply with all minimum federal requirements related to Medicaid provider enrollment. The department shall notify the applicant that the department has received the application within 15 days of receipt of the application. The department shall enroll the applicant or notify the applicant that the applicant does not meet the criteria listed in paragraph (2) within 90 days of receipt of the application.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an applicant or provider who meets all of the following criteria shall be eligible for enrollment in the Medi-Cal program pursuant to this subdivision, after submission and review of a short form application:

(A) The applicant’s or provider’s practice is based in one or more of the following: a general acute care hospital, a
 rural general acute care hospital, or an acute psychiatric hospital, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) The applicant or provider holds a current, unrevoked, or unsuspended license as a physician and surgeon issued by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California. An applicant or provider shall not be in compliance with this subparagraph if a license revocation has been stayed, the licensee has been placed on probation, or the license is subject to any other limitation.

(C) The applicant or provider does not have an adverse entry in the federal Healthcare Integrity and Protection Data Bank.

(3) An applicant shall be granted provisional provider status under this subdivision for a period of 12 months.

(f) Except as provided in subdivision (g), within 180 days after receiving an application package submitted pursuant to subdivision (a), or from the date of the notice to an applicant or provider that the applicant or provider does not qualify as a preferred provider under subdivision (d), the department shall give written notice to the applicant or provider that any of the following applies, or shall on the 181st day grant the applicant or provider provisional provider status pursuant to this section for a period no longer than 12 months, effective from the 181st day:

(1) The applicant or provider is being granted provisional provider status for a period of 12 months, effective from the date on the notice.

(2) The application package is incomplete. The notice shall identify additional information or documentation that
 is needed to complete the application package.

(3) The department is exercising its authority under Section 14043.37, 14043.4, or 14043.7, and is conducting background checks, preenrollment inspections, or unannounced visits.

(4) The application package is denied for any of the following reasons:

(A) Pursuant to Section 14043.2 or 14043.36.

(B) For lack of a license necessary to perform the health care services or to provide the goods, supplies, or merchandise directly or indirectly to a Medi-Cal beneficiary, within the applicable provider of service category or subgroup of that category.

(C) The period of time during which an applicant or provider has been barred from reapplying has not
 passed.

(D) For other stated reasons authorized by law.

(E) For failing to submit fingerprints as required by federal Medicaid regulations.

(F) For failing to pay an application fee as required by federal Medicaid regulations.

(5) The application package is withdrawn by request of the applicant or provider and the department’s review is canceled pursuant to subdivision (n).

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), within 90 days after receiving an application package submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) from a physician or physician group licensed by the Medical Board of California or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, or from the date of the notice to that physician or physician
 group that does not qualify as a preferred provider under subdivision (d), or within 90 days after receiving a change of location form submitted pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall give written notice to the applicant or provider that either paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (f) applies, or shall on the 91st day grant the applicant or provider provisional provider status pursuant to this section for a period no longer than 12 months, effective from the 91st day.

(h) (1) If the application package that was noticed as incomplete under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) is resubmitted with all requested information and documentation, and received by the department within 60 days of the date on the notice, the department shall, within 60 days of the resubmission, send a notice that any of the following applies:

(A) The applicant or
 provider is being granted provisional provider status for a period of 12 months, effective from the date on the notice.

(B) The application package is denied for any other reasons provided for in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f).

(C) The department is exercising its authority under Section 14043.37, 14043.4, or 14043.7 to conduct background checks, preenrollment inspections, or unannounced visits.

(D) The application package is withdrawn by request of the applicant or provider and the department’s review is canceled pursuant to subdivision (n).

(2) (A) If the application package that was noticed as incomplete under paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) is not resubmitted with all requested information and documentation and received by
 the department within 60 days of the date on the notice, the application package shall be denied by operation of law. The applicant or provider may reapply by submitting a new application package that shall be reviewed de novo.

(B) If the failure to resubmit is by a currently enrolled provider as defined in Section 14043.1, including providers applying for continued enrollment, the failure may make the provider also subject to deactivation of the provider’s number and all of the business addresses used by the provider to provide services, goods, supplies, or merchandise to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if the notice of an incomplete application package included a request for information or documentation related to grounds for denial under Section 14043.2 or 14043.36, the applicant or provider shall not reapply for enrollment or continued enrollment
 in the Medi-Cal program or for participation in any health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors for a period of three years.

(i) (1) If the department exercises its authority under Section 14043.37, 14043.4, or 14043.7 to conduct background checks, preenrollment inspections, or unannounced visits, the applicant or provider shall receive notice, from the department, after the conclusion of the background check, preenrollment inspection, or unannounced visit of either of the following:

(A) The applicant or provider is granted provisional provider status for a period of 12 months, effective from the date on the notice.

(B) Discrepancies or failure to meet program requirements, as prescribed by the department, have been found to exist during the preenrollment
 period.

(2) (A) The notice shall identify the discrepancies or failures, and whether remediation can be made or not, and if so, the time period within which remediation must be accomplished. Failure to remediate discrepancies and failures as prescribed by the department, or notification that remediation is not available, shall result in denial of the application by operation of law. The applicant or provider may reapply by submitting a new application package that shall be reviewed de novo.

(B) If the failure to remediate is by a currently enrolled provider as defined in Section 14043.1, including providers applying for continued enrollment, the failure may make the provider also subject to deactivation of the provider’s number and all of the business addresses used by the provider to provide services, goods, supplies, or merchandise to Medi-Cal
 beneficiaries.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if the discrepancies or failure to meet program requirements, as prescribed by the director, included in the notice were related to grounds for denial under Section 14043.2 or 14043.36, the applicant or provider shall not reapply for three years.

(j) If provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status is granted pursuant to this section, a provider number shall be used by the provider for each business address for which an application package has been approved. This provider number shall be used exclusively for the locations for which it was approved, unless the practice of the provider’s profession or delivery of services, goods, supplies, or merchandise is such that services, goods, supplies, or merchandise are rendered or delivered at locations other than the provider’s business address and this practice
 or delivery of services, goods, supplies, or merchandise has been disclosed in the application package approved by the department when the provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status was granted.

(k) Except for providers subject to subdivision (c) of Section 14043.47, a provider currently enrolled in the Medi-Cal program at one or more locations who has submitted an application package for enrollment at a new location or a change in location pursuant to subdivision (a), or filed a change of location form pursuant to subdivision (b), may submit claims for services, goods, supplies, or merchandise rendered at the new location until the application package or change of location form is approved or denied under this section, and shall not be subject, during that period, to deactivation, or be subject to any delay or nonpayment of claims as a result of billing for services rendered at the new location as herein authorized.
 However, the provider shall be considered during that period to have been granted provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status and be subject to termination of that status pursuant to Section 14043.27. A provider that is subject to subdivision (c) of Section 14043.47 may come within the scope of this subdivision upon submitting documentation in the application package that identifies the physician providing supervision for every three locations. If a provider submits claims for services rendered at a new location before the application for that location is received by the department, the department may deny the claim.

(l) An applicant or a provider whose application for enrollment, continued enrollment, or a new location or change in location has been denied pursuant to this section, may appeal the denial in accordance with Section 14043.65.

(m) (1) Upon receipt of a complete and accurate claim for an individual nurse provider, the department shall adjudicate the claim within an average of 30 days.

(2) During the budget proceedings of the 2006–07 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall provide data to the Legislature specifying the timeframe under which it has processed and approved the provider applications submitted by individual nurse providers.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “individual nurse providers” are providers authorized under certain home- and community-based waivers and under the state plan to provide nursing services to Medi-Cal recipients in the recipients’ own homes rather than in institutional settings.

(n) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an applicant or provider
 may request to withdraw an application package submitted pursuant to this section at any time, at which point the department’s review shall be canceled.

(2) The department’s review shall not be canceled if, at the time the applicant or provider requests to withdraw the application package, the department has already initiated its review under Section 14043.37, 14043.4, or 14043.7.

(o) (1) For the period beginning on July 1, 2026, and ending on June 30, 2027, an applicant or provider shall not be granted provisional or preferred provisional enrollment status in the Medi-Cal program as a result of the department’s failure to act within any of the following statutory timeframes:

(A) The 90-day determination period
 described in subdivision (e).

(B) The 90-day determination period described in subdivision (g).

(C) The 180-day extended determination period described in subdivision (f).

(D) The 60-day determination period for supplemental information described in subdivision (h).

(2) During the period described in paragraph (1), the department’s failure to issue a determination within the applicable timeframe shall not result in approval by default, and the application shall remain pending unless and until the department issues a written determination consistent with all applicable state and federal Medicaid screening requirements.

(3) Nothing in this subdivision limits the department’s authority to
 deny, terminate, or otherwise act upon an application under this article during the review period.

(4) This subdivision shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 83.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.27.

(a) If an applicant or provider is granted provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status pursuant to Section 14043.26 and, if at any time during the provisional provider status
 period, preferred provisional provider status period, or full-enrollment status period, the department conducts any announced or unannounced visits or any additional inspections or reviews pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or the regulations adopted thereunder, or pursuant to Section 100185.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and discovers or otherwise determines the existence of any ground to deactivate the provider’s number and business addresses or suspend the provider from the Medi-Cal program pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or the regulations adopted thereunder, or pursuant to Section 100185.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or if any of the circumstances listed in subdivision (c) occur, the department shall terminate the provisional provider
 status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status of the provider, regardless of whether the period of time for which the provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status was granted under Section 14043.26 has elapsed.

(b) (1) Termination of provisional provider
 status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status shall include deactivation of the provider’s number, including all business addresses used by the provider to obtain reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program and removal of the provider from enrollment in the Medi-Cal program, except where the termination is based upon a ground related solely to a specific location for which provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status was granted. Termination of provisional provider
 status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status, based upon grounds related solely to a specific location may include failure to have an established place of business, failure to possess the business or zoning permits or other approvals necessary to operate a business, or failure to possess the appropriate licenses, permits, or certificates necessary for the provider of service category or subcategory identified by the provider in its application package.

(2) Providers shall continuously maintain compliance with all federal, state, and local requirements. The department may request evidence of compliance with established place of
 business requirements at any time and may conduct site verification activities and unannounced site inspections. Refusal to cooperate or permit access to these sites shall constitute grounds for denial, suspension, or termination. Use of maildrop locations and virtual offices, unless exempted by the department, or nonoperational spaces shall be considered noncompliance with established place of business requirements.

(3) Where the grounds relate solely to a specific location, the termination of provisional provider
 status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status shall include only deactivation of the specific locations that the grounds apply to and shall include removal of the provider from enrollment in the Medi-Cal program only if, after deactivation of the specific locations, the provider does not have any business address that is not deactivated.

(c) The following circumstances are grounds for termination of provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider
 status, or full-enrollment status:

(1) The provider, persons with an ownership or control interest in the provider, or persons who are directors, officers, or managing employees of the provider have been convicted of any felony, or convicted of any misdemeanor involving fraud or abuse in any government program, related to neglect or abuse of a patient in connection with the delivery of a health care item or service, or in connection with the interference with, or obstruction of, any investigation into health care related fraud or abuse, or have been found liable for fraud or abuse in any civil proceeding, or have entered into a settlement in lieu of conviction for fraud or abuse in any government
 program.

(2) There is a material discrepancy in the information provided to the department, or with the requirements to be enrolled, that is discovered after provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status has been granted and that cannot be corrected because the discrepancy occurred in the past.

(3) The provider has provided material information that was false or misleading at the time it was
 provided.

(4) The provider failed to have an established place of business at the business address for which the application package was submitted at the time of any onsite inspection, announced or unannounced visit, or any additional inspection or review conducted pursuant to this article or a statute or regulation governing the Medi-Cal program, unless the practice of the provider’s profession or delivery of services, goods, supplies, or merchandise is such that services, goods, supplies, or merchandise are rendered or delivered at locations other than the business address and this practice or delivery of services, goods, supplies, or merchandise has been disclosed in the application package approved by the department when the provisional provider status,
 preferred provisional provider
 status, or full-enrollment status was granted.

(5) The provider meets the definition of a clinic under Section 1200 of the Health and Safety Code, but is not licensed as a clinic pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and fails to meet the requirements to qualify for at least one exemption pursuant to Section 1206 or 1206.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) The provider performs clinical laboratory tests or examinations, but it or its personnel do not meet CLIA, and the regulations adopted thereunder, and the state clinical laboratory law, do not possess valid CLIA certificates and clinical laboratory registrations or licenses pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or are not exempt from licensure as a clinical
 laboratory under Section 1241 of the Business and Professions Code.

(7) The provider fails to possess either of the following:

(A) The appropriate licenses, permits, certificates, or other approvals needed to practice the profession or occupation, or provide the services, goods, supplies, or merchandise the provider identified in the application package approved by the department when the provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status was
 granted and for the location for which the application was submitted.

(B) The business or zoning permits or other approvals necessary to operate a business at the location identified in its application package approved by the department when the provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status was granted.

(8) The provider, or if the provider is a clinic, group, partnership, corporation, or other association, any officer, director, or
 shareholder with a 10 percent or greater interest in that organization, commits two or more violations of the federal or state statutes or regulations governing the Medi-Cal program, and the violations demonstrate a pattern or practice of fraud, abuse, or provision of unnecessary or substandard medical services.

(9) The provider commits any violation of a federal or state statute or regulation governing the Medi-Cal program or of a statute or regulation governing the provider’s profession or occupation and the violation represents a threat of immediate jeopardy or significant harm to any Medi-Cal beneficiary or to the public welfare.

(10) The provider submits claims for payment that subject a provider to suspension under Section 14043.61.

(11) The provider submits claims for payment for services, goods, supplies, or
 merchandise rendered at a location other than the business address or addresses listed on the application for enrollment, unless the practice of the provider’s profession or delivery of services, goods, supplies, or merchandise is such that services, goods, supplies, or merchandise are rendered or delivered at locations other than the business address and this practice or delivery of services, goods, supplies, or merchandise has been disclosed in the application package approved by the department when the provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status was granted.

(12) The provider has not paid
 its fine, or has a debt due and owing, including overpayments and penalty assessments, to any federal, state, or local government entity that relates to Medicare, Medicaid, Medi-Cal, or any other federal or state health care program, and has not made satisfactory arrangements to fulfill the obligation or otherwise been excused by legal process from fulfilling the obligation.

(d) If, during a provisional provider status period or a preferred provisional provider status period, the department conducts any announced or unannounced visits or any additional inspections or reviews pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), or the regulations adopted thereunder, and commences an investigation for fraud or abuse, or discovers
 or otherwise determines that the provider is under investigation for fraud or abuse by any other state, local, or federal government
 agency, including any local, state, or federal program, at the department’s discretion, the provider shall be subject to termination of provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status, regardless of whether the period of time for which the provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status was granted under Section 14043.26 has elapsed.

(e) A provider whose provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider
 status, or full-enrollment status has been terminated pursuant to this section may appeal the termination in accordance with Section 14043.65.

(f) Any department-recovered fine or debt due and owing, including overpayments, that are subsequently determined to have been erroneously collected shall be promptly refunded to the provider, together with interest paid in accordance with subdivision (e) of Section 14171 and Section 14172.5.

(g) Legally protected health care activity, as defined in Title 1.81.7 (commencing with Section 1798.300) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, shall not, by virtue of the nature of that activity alone, result in termination from the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 21.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.28.

(a) (1) If an application package is denied under Section 14043.26 or provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status is terminated under Section 14043.27, the applicant or provider shall be prohibited from reapplying for enrollment or continued enrollment in the Medi-Cal program or for participation in any health care program administered by the department or
 its agents or contractors for a period of three years from the date the application package is denied or the provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status is terminated, except as provided otherwise in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h), or paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), of Section 14043.26 and as set forth in this section.

(2) If the application is denied under paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 14043.26 because the applicant failed to resubmit an incomplete application package or is denied under paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 14043.26 because the applicant failed to remediate discrepancies, the applicant may resubmit an application in accordance with paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (h) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), respectively.

(3) If the denial of the application package is based upon a conviction for any offense or for any act included in Section 14043.36 or termination of the provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status is based upon a conviction for any offense or for any act included in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14043.27, the applicant or provider shall be prohibited from reapplying for enrollment or continued enrollment in the Medi-Cal
 program or for participation in any health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors for a period of 10 years from the date the application package is denied or the provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status is terminated.

(4) If the denial of the application package is based upon two or more convictions for any offense or for any two or more acts included in Section 14043.36 or termination of the provisional provider
 status,
 preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status is based upon two or more convictions for any offense or for any two acts included in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 14043.27, the applicant or provider shall be permanently barred from enrollment or continued enrollment in the Medi-Cal program or for participation in any health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors.

(5) The prohibition in paragraph (1) against reapplying for three years shall not apply if the denial of the application or termination of provisional provider
 status,
 preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status is based upon any of the following:

(A) The grounds provided for in paragraph (4), or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7), of subdivision (c) of Section 14043.27.

(B) The grounds provided for in subdivision (d) of Section 14043.27, if the investigation is closed without any adverse action being taken.

(C) The grounds provided for in paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 14043.27. However, the department may deny reimbursement for claims submitted while the provider was noncompliant with the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement
 Amendments of 1988 (CLIA) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a et seq.).

(D) The grounds provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 14043.36 for being terminated or excluded under Medicare or under the Medicaid program or Children’s Health Insurance Program of any other state.

(b) (1) If an application package is denied under subparagraph (A), (B), (D), or (E) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 14043.26, or with respect to a provider described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (h), or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (i), of Section 14043.26, or provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider
 status, or full-enrollment status is terminated based upon any of the grounds stated in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7), or paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (5), and (8) to (12), inclusive, of subdivision (c) of Section 14043.27, all business addresses of the applicant or provider shall be deactivated and the applicant or provider shall be removed from enrollment in the Medi-Cal program by operation of law.

(2) If the termination of provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status is based upon the grounds stated in subdivision (d) of Section 14043.27 and the investigation is closed without any adverse action being taken, or is based upon the grounds in subparagraph
 (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) of Section 14043.27 and the applicant or provider obtains the appropriate license, permits, or approvals covering the period of provisional provider status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status, the termination taken pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14043.27 shall be rescinded, the previously deactivated provider numbers shall be reactivated, and the provider shall be reenrolled in the Medi-Cal program, unless there are other grounds for taking these actions.

(c) Claims that are submitted or caused to be submitted by an applicant or provider who has been suspended from the Medi-Cal program for any reason or who has had its provisional provider
 status, preferred provisional provider status, or full-enrollment status
 terminated or had its application package for enrollment or continued enrollment denied and all business addresses deactivated may not be paid for services, goods, merchandise, or supplies rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries during the period of suspension or termination or after the date all business addresses are deactivated.

(d) Legally protected health care activity, as defined in Title 1.81.7 (commencing with Section 1798.300) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, shall not, by virtue of the nature of that activity alone, result in denial, suspension, or termination from the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 22.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.29.

(a) If, at the end of the period for which provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status was granted under Section 14043.26, all of the following conditions are met, the provisional status shall cease and the provider shall be enrolled in the Medi-Cal program without designation as a provisional provider:

(1) The
 provider has demonstrated an appropriate volume of business.

(2) The provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status has not been terminated or if it has been terminated, the act of termination was rescinded.

(3) The provider continues to meet the standards for enrollment in the Medi-Cal program as set forth in this article and Section 51000 and following of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) (1) An applicant or a provider who applied for enrollment or continued enrollment in the Medi-Cal program, prior to May 1, 2003, and for whom the application has not been approved or denied, or who has not received a notice on or before January 1, 2004, that the department is exercising its authority under Section 14043.37, 14043.4, or 14043.7 to conduct background